Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,242
Violations; penalty.

(1) Any person who knowingly violates the Conveyance Safety Act is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Each violation shall be a separate offense.

(2) Any person who installs a conveyance in violation of the Conveyance Safety Act is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2533;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 78.